Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1138
Exception, defined.

An exception is an objection taken to a decision of the court upon a matter of law.

R.S.1867, Code § 307, p. 445;

R.S.1913, § 7876;

C.S.1922, § 8821;

C.S.1929, § 20-1138;

R.S.1943, § 25-1138.